Utah statutes.
17-18a-102.   Definitions.

(1)  "Attorney" means a county attorney described in Section 17-18a-301 or a district attorney described in Section 17-18a-301.

(2)  "Prosecution district" means a district created under Part 7, Prosecution District.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

